Maine, session 132, LD1707.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §60 is enacted to read:
§60. State financial assistance; United States citizenship required
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State may not provide any
form of financial assistance to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States. This
section does not apply to the provision of general purpose aid for local schools distributed
in accordance with Title 20-A, chapter 606-B.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4301, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2015, c. 324, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Eligible person. "Eligible person" means a person citizen of the United States who
is qualified to receive general assistance from a municipality according to standards of
eligibility determined by the municipal officers whether or not that person has applied for
general assistance. "Eligible person" does not include a person who is a fugitive from
justice as defined in Title 15, section 201, subsection 4. Beginning July 1, 2015, in
accordance with 8 United States Code, Section 1621(d), "eligible person" means a person
who is lawfully present in the United States or who is pursuing a lawful process to apply
for immigration relief, except that assistance for such a person may not exceed 24 months.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §2007 is enacted to read:
§2007. Ineligibility for state funds based on immigration policies
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a municipality that has in effect
any ordinance, policy or procedure, formal or informal, in contravention of the federal
Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, Section 642,
subsection (a) or (b) or that prohibits, formally or informally, a local law enforcement
officer from gathering information regarding the lawful or unlawful citizenship or
immigration status of any individual is ineligible for any form of financial assistance from
the State, including, but not limited to, state-municipal revenue sharing pursuant to section
5681 and funding for municipal general assistance pursuant to Title 22, chapter 1161.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §2008 is enacted to read:
§2008. Municipal assistance; United States citizenship required
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a municipality may not provide
any form of financial assistance to an individual who is not a citizen of the United States.
This section does not apply to the provision of general purpose aid for local schools
distributed in accordance with Title 20-A, chapter 606-B.